Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1201.19
Divisions; avoid duplication.

The divisions shall avoid the duplication of existing programs or services and, to the extent possible, shall use existing programs and organizations to implement the program and objectives of the division.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 19.